Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.210

Physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic—Liability.

(1) No act or omission of any physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, or any emergency medical technician or first responder, as defined in RCW 18.73.030, done or omitted in good faith while rendering emergency medical service under the responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician or an approved medical program director or delegate(s) to a person who has suffered illness or bodily injury shall impose any liability upon:

(a) The physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic, emergency medical technician, or first responder;

(b) The medical program director;

(c) The supervising physician(s);

(d) Any hospital, the officers, members of the staff, nurses, or other employees of a hospital;

(e) Any training agency or training physician(s);

(f) Any licensed ambulance service; or

(g) Any federal, state, county, city, or other local governmental unit or employees of such a governmental unit.

(2) This section shall apply to an act or omission committed or omitted in the performance of the actual emergency medical procedures and not in the commission or omission of an act which is not within the field of medical expertise of the physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic, emergency medical technician, or first responder, as the case may be.

This section shall apply also to emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, paramedics, and medical program directors participating in a community assistance referral and education services program established under RCW 35.21.930.

(3) This section shall apply also, as to the entities and personnel described in subsection (1) of this section, to any act or omission committed or omitted in good faith by such entities or personnel in rendering services at the request of an approved medical program director in the training of emergency medical service personnel for certification or recertification pursuant to this chapter.

(4) This section shall apply also, as to the entities and personnel described in subsection (1) of this section, to any act or omission committed or omitted in good faith by such entities or personnel involved in the transport of patients to mental health facilities or chemical dependency programs, in accordance with applicable alternative facility procedures adopted under RCW 70.168.100.

(5) This section shall not apply to any act or omission which constitutes either gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

[ 2015 c 157 s 5; 2015 c 93 s 4; 1997 c 275 s 1; 1997 c 245 s 1. Prior: 1995 c 103 s 1; 1995 c 65 s 4; 1989 c 260 s 4; 1987 c 212 s 502; 1986 c 68 s 4; 1983 c 112 s 3; 1977 c 55 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 305 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2015 c 93 s 4 and by 2015 c 157 s 5, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—1995 c 103: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 19, 1995]." [ 1995 c 103 s 3.]